Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Chapter 1. State Highway Law; General Transportation Provisions
§ 10b.
Statement of policy; general.

The Agency shall be the responsible agency of the State for the development of transportation policy. It shall develop a mission statement to reflect:

that State transportation policy shall be to encompass, coordinate, and integrate all modes of transportation and to consider “complete streets” principles, which are principles of safety and accommodation of all transportation system users, regardless of age, ability, or modal preference; and

the need for transportation projects that will improve the State’s economic infrastructure, as well as the use of resources in efficient, coordinated, integrated, cost-effective, and environmentally sound ways, and that will be consistent with the recommendations of the Comprehensive Energy Plan (CEP) issued under

30 V.S.A. § 202b

.

The Agency shall coordinate planning and education efforts with those of the Vermont Climate Change Oversight Committee and those of local and regional planning entities:

to ensure that the transportation system as a whole is integrated, that access to the transportation system as a whole is integrated, and that statewide, local, and regional conservation and efficiency opportunities and practices are integrated; and

to support employer-led or local or regional government-led conservation, efficiency, rideshare, and bicycle programs and other innovative transportation advances, especially employer-based incentives.

In developing the State’s annual Transportation Program, the Agency shall, consistent with the planning goals listed in

24 V.S.A. § 4302

as amended by 1988 Acts and Resolves No. 200 and with appropriate consideration to local, regional, and State agency plans:

Develop or incorporate designs that provide integrated, safe, and efficient transportation and that are consistent with the recommendations of the CEP.

Consider the safety and accommodation of all transportation system users—including motorists, bicyclists, public transportation users, and pedestrians of all ages and abilities—in all State- and municipally managed transportation projects and project phases, including planning, development, construction, and maintenance, except in the case of projects or project components involving unpaved highways. If, after the consideration required under this subdivision, a State-managed project does not incorporate complete streets principles, the project manager shall make a written determination, supported by documentation and available for public inspection at the Agency, that one or more of the following circumstances exist:
(2) (A) Consider the safety and accommodation of all transportation system users—including motorists, bicyclists, public transportation users, and pedestrians of all ages and abilities—in all State- and municipally managed transportation projects and project phases, including planning, development, construction, and maintenance, except in the case of projects or project components involving unpaved highways. If, after the consideration required under this subdivision, a State-managed project does not incorporate complete streets principles, the project manager shall make a written determination, supported by documentation and available for public inspection at the Agency, that one or more of the following circumstances exist:

Use of the transportation facility by pedestrians, bicyclists, or other users is prohibited by law.

The cost of incorporating complete streets principles is disproportionate to the need or probable use as determined by factors including land use, current and projected user volumes, population density, crash data, historic and natural resource constraints, and maintenance requirements. The Agency shall consult local and regional plans, as appropriate, in assessing these and any other relevant factors.

Incorporating complete streets principles is outside the scope of a project because of its very nature.

The written determination required under subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2) shall be final and shall not be subject to appeal or further review.

Promote economic opportunities for Vermonters and the best use of the State’s environmental and historic resources.

Manage available funding to:

give priority to preserving the functionality of the existing transportation infrastructure, including bicycle and pedestrian trails regardless of whether they are located along a highway shoulder; and

adhere to credible project delivery schedules.

The Agency of Transportation, in developing each of the program prioritization systems schedules for all modes of transportation, shall include the following throughout the process:

The Agency shall annually solicit input from each of the regional planning commissions and the Chittenden County Metropolitan Planning Organization on regional priorities within each schedule, and those inputs shall be factored into the prioritizations for each program area and shall afford the opportunity of adding new projects to the schedules.

Each year, the Agency shall provide in the front of the Transportation Program book a detailed explanation describing the factors in the prioritization system that creates each project list.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 1, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 89

, § 20;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 48;

2007, No. 75

, § 34, eff. June 7, 2007;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2011, No. 34

, § 2;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 10c.
Statement of policy; highways and bridges.

For projects that are on the National Highway System, if site conditions, environmental factors, or engineering factors restrict the use of national standards for geometric design, the Agency may pursue exceptions to those standards when appropriate to comply with local or regional plans as interpreted by the adopting entities, or with federal or State long-range plans as adopted, or with local conditions.

For projects that are not on the National Highway System, the Agency shall develop and implement State standards for geometric design. Design speeds may be lower than legal speeds. Design speeds lower than legal speeds may be used without the requirement of a formal design exception, provided appropriate warnings are posted.

In choosing between the improvement of an existing highway and complete reconstruction, the Agency shall weigh the following factors:

disruption to homes and businesses;

environmental impacts;

the benefits attainable by designing and constructing the improvement as a limited access facility;

the potential effects on the local and State economies;

cost-effectiveness;

mobility;

safety, as determined by factors such as accident history for motorists, pedestrians, and bicyclists;

local or regional plans as interpreted by the adopting entity and State agency plans;

the impact on the historic, scenic, and aesthetic values of the municipality, as interpreted by the municipality, in which the highway is located; and

if it is a forest highway under federal jurisdiction.

It shall be the policy of the State in developing projects as defined in subsection (b) of this section for the resurfacing, restoration, rehabilitation, and reconstruction of bridges and the approaches to bridges to favor their preservation within their existing footprints, in order to ensure compatibility with the Vermont setting and context and to reduce costs and environmental impacts.

The Agency shall investigate and implement, where feasible, policies and programs to allow municipal governments to develop projects or construct projects, or both, under the Agency’s oversight in accordance with federal laws and regulations if federal funds are used.

It shall be the policy of the State, as defined in subsection (b) of this section, to favor the rehabilitation of existing bridges. In choosing between the rehabilitation of an existing bridge and the construction of a new bridge, whether on the existing location or on a new location, the Agency shall weigh the following factors, in addition to the factors specified in subsection (c) of this section:

the functional classification of the highway;

the load capacity and geometric constraints of the bridge and the availability of alternative routes;

the comparative long-term costs, risks, and benefits of rehabilitation and new construction; and

the requirements of State standards for geometric design.

With regard to a bridge located on a municipal highway, a municipality may request the Agency to adhere to one or more of the following guidelines:

where feasible, the rehabilitated or replacement bridge shall occupy the same curb-to-curb width or alignment, or both, as the existing bridge or the existing approaches to the existing bridge, or both;

unless otherwise required by law, a bridge that does not already carry a sidewalk may be rehabilitated without adding a sidewalk and a replacement bridge may be built without a sidewalk or with a sidewalk on only one side; or

in rehabilitating a historically significant bridge, the design of the rehabilitated bridge must retain the bridge’s historic character, to the extent feasible.

In implementing the policies that are established in subsections (f) and (g) of this section, with regard to a bridge located on a municipal highway:

the affected municipality shall conduct a public hearing as early as is feasible in the project scoping process to identify pertinent issues;

the Agency shall identify and present to the affected municipality feasible alternative solutions before it prepares conceptual plans for the proposed project; and

the Agency’s presentation of feasible alternative solutions shall include estimates of the total preliminary engineering and construction costs for each alternative.

Adherence by the Agency to one or more of the policies established in this section for a specific project shall constitute the selection of a particular set of standards for the purposes of

12 V.S.A. § 5601(e)(8)

.

Upon final payment of a paving contract with the Agency of Transportation that contains liquidated damages from a paving contractor for failure to complete work on time, such damages shall be paid by the Agency of Transportation to the town or towns in which the work was not completed on time. In no case shall the liquidated damages paid to a town or towns exceed the State share of those liquidated damages for that paving project. If such a project is in more than one town, each town shall receive an amount of liquidated damages equal to its percentage of the State share of uncompleted work.

, (l)[Repealed.]

(m)

Recycled asphalt pavement (RAP) shall be used on all Agency paving projects to the extent sources of quality RAP are available consistent with producing quality hot mix asphalt. To that extent, the Agency shall define paving project specifications and contract bid documents to allow the use of up to 50 percent RAP. The Agency shall compare the cost-benefit of the State’s retaining the RAP versus the contractor’s retaining the RAP, and the Agency shall report to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation on the results of the comparison in the 2009 and 2010 legislative sessions.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 2, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

1993, No. 89

, § 21;

1995, No. 140

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 18

, § 41r, eff. May 13, 1999;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 50, 57, 58, eff. May 22, 2008;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 10d.
Statement of policy; airports.

The Agency shall continue to promote the preservation of existing public airports, reduction of hazards to air navigation, and, where the need is indicated, modest expansion of existing public facilities.

On the State airport system, the Agency shall continue to supplement ongoing maintenance activities with a program of capital improvements as the availability of federal and State funds permits.

The Agency shall monitor developments at regional hub airports to ensure fair and adequate access to the national air transportation network for Vermont shippers and travelers. In furtherance of this policy, the Secretary may use available funds to contract for the services of consultants, experts, and specialized legal counsel.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 3, eff. June 22, 1989.

§ 10e.
Statement of policy; railroads.

The General Assembly recognizes that rail service, both passenger and freight, is an integral part of the State’s transportation network and that it must be fully integrated into the State’s transportation network as a whole. Accordingly, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of Vermont:

To provide opportunities for rail passenger services by cooperating with the federal government, other states, and providers of those services, with priority to be given to the services likely to complement the State’s other transportation resources and Vermont’s economic development efforts and to meet the needs of the traveling public. Goals to increase passenger rail use will be in accordance with the Agency’s rail plan.

To preserve and modernize for continued freight railroad service those railroad lines, both within the State of Vermont and extending into adjoining states, that directly affect the economy of the State or provide connections to other railroad lines that directly affect the economy of the State. Goals to increase freight rail use will be in accordance with the Agency’s rail plan.

In those cases where continuation of freight railroad service is not economically feasible under present conditions, to preserve established railroad rights-of-way for future reactivation of railroad service, trail corridors, and other public purposes not inconsistent with future reactivation of railroad service.

To seek federal aid for rail projects that implement this section’s policy goals.

To maintain and improve intercity bus and rail and freight and commuter rail services, and the necessary intermodal connections, and to increase the efficiency of equipment and the extent to which equipment selection and operation can limit or avoid the emission of greenhouse gases.

To plan for increased ridership with city-to-city and commuter rail service, and for increased coordination of rail service with bus service, car-pooling, and ride-sharing opportunities.

To complement the regular maintenance efforts of the lessee/operators of State-owned railroads, taking into account each line’s long-term importance to the State’s transportation network, economic development, the resources available to the lessee/operator and relevant provisions of leases and other agreements, the Agency may develop programs to assist in major rehabilitation or replacement of obsolete bridges, structures, rails, and other fixtures.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 4, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 12, eff. June 4, 2003;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 10f.
Statement of policy; public transportation.

It shall be the State’s policy to make maximum use of available federal funds for the support of public transportation. State operating support funds shall be included in Agency operating budgets to the extent that funds are available. It shall be the State’s policy to support the maintenance of existing public transportation services, to ensure the rapid replacement of any unplanned decrease in service, and to support the creation of new service that is accessible and affordable to those who use these services.

The Agency of Transportation shall develop and periodically update a plan for investment in public transportation services and infrastructure as part of an integrated transportation system consistent with the goals established in

24 V.S.A. § 5083

and regional transportation development plan proposals and regional plans as required by

24 V.S.A. § 5089

. The plan shall include components that shall coordinate rideshare, public transit, park and ride, interstate, and bicycle and pedestrian planning and investment at the State, regional, and local levels, and create or expand regional connections within the State in order to maximize interregional ridesharing and access to public transit.

The Agency shall develop and make available to the traveling public an integrated, statewide online service that coordinates transportation options and provides web-based access to information that will allow the traveling public integrated, convenient, affordable, and dependable access to alternative transportation modes sufficient to allow efficient, cost-effective, and timely travel throughout the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 5, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 36, eff. June 4, 2003;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2021, No. 20

, § 79.

§ 10g.
Annual report; Transportation Program; advancements, cancellations, and delays.

The Agency of Transportation shall annually present to the General Assembly a multiyear Transportation Program covering the same number of years as the Statewide Transportation Improvement Program (STIP), consisting of the recommended budget for all Agency activities for the ensuing fiscal year and projected spending levels for all Agency activities for the following fiscal years. The Program shall include a description and year-by-year breakdown of recommended and projected funding of all projects proposed to be funded within the time period of the STIP and, in addition, a description of all projects that are not recommended for funding in the first fiscal year of the proposed Program but that are scheduled for construction during the time period covered by the STIP. The Program shall be consistent with the planning process established by 1988 Acts and Resolves No. 200, as codified in 3 V.S.A. chapter 67 and 24 V.S.A. chapter 117, the statements of policy set forth in sections 10b-10f of this title, and the long-range systems plan, corridor studies, and project priorities developed through the capital planning process under section 10i of this title.

Projected spending in future fiscal years shall be based on revenue estimates as follows:

with respect to State funds, on the consensus forecast for Transportation Fund revenue adopted pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 305a

and for later years on other consensus or Executive Branch estimates of Transportation Fund revenues; and

with respect to federal funds, on such federal regulations that apply to the development of the STIP.

The Program proposed by the Agency shall include systemwide performance measures developed by the Agency to describe the condition of the Vermont transportation network. The Program shall discuss the background and utility of the performance measures, track the performance measures over time, and, where appropriate, recommend the setting of targets for the performance measures.

[Repealed.]

The Agency’s annual Transportation Program shall include a separate report summarizing with respect to the most recently ended fiscal year:
(e) (1) The Agency’s annual Transportation Program shall include a separate report summarizing with respect to the most recently ended fiscal year:

all expenditures of funds by source; and

all unexpended appropriations of transportation funds and TIB funds that have been carried forward from the previous fiscal year to the ensuing fiscal year.

The summary shall identify expenditures and carry forwards for each program category included in the proposed annual Transportation Program as adopted for the closed fiscal year in question and such other information as the Agency deems appropriate.

Each year following enactment of a Transportation Program under this section, the Agency shall prepare and make available to the public the Transportation Program established by the General Assembly. The resulting document shall be entered in the permanent records of the Agency and of the Board, and shall constitute the State’s official Transportation Program.

The Agency’s annual proposed Transportation Program shall include project updates referencing this section and listing the following:

all proposed projects in the Program that would be new to the State Transportation Program if adopted;

all projects for which total estimated costs have increased by more than $8,000,000.00 or by more than 100 percent from the estimate in the prior fiscal year’s approved Transportation Program;

all projects funded for construction in the prior fiscal year’s approved Transportation Program that are no longer funded in the proposed Transportation Program submitted to the General Assembly, the projected costs for such projects in the prior fiscal year’s approved Transportation Program, and the total costs incurred over the life of each such project.

Should capital projects in the Transportation Program be delayed because of unanticipated problems with permitting, right-of-way acquisition, construction, local concern, or availability of federal or State funds, the Secretary is authorized to advance projects in the approved Transportation Program. The Secretary is further authorized to undertake projects to resolve emergency or safety issues. Upon authorizing a project to resolve an emergency or safety issue, the Secretary shall give prompt notice of the decision and action taken to the Joint Fiscal Office and to the House and Senate Committees on Transportation when the General Assembly is in session, and when the General Assembly is not in session, to the Joint Transportation Oversight Committee, the Joint Fiscal Office, and the Joint Fiscal Committee. Should an approved project in the current Transportation Program require additional funding to maintain the approved schedule, the Agency is authorized to allocate the necessary resources. However, the Secretary shall not delay or suspend work on approved projects to reallocate funding for other projects except when other funding options are not available. In such case, the Secretary shall notify the Joint Transportation Oversight Committee, the Joint Fiscal Office, and the Joint Fiscal Committee when the General Assembly is not in session and the House and Senate Committees on Transportation and the Joint Fiscal Office when the General Assembly is in session. With respect to projects in the approved Transportation Program, the Secretary shall notify, in the district affected, the regional planning commission, the municipality, legislators, the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, and the Joint Fiscal Office of any change that likely will affect the fiscal year in which the project is planned to go to construction. No project shall be canceled without the approval of the General Assembly, except that the Agency may cancel a municipal project upon the request or concurrence of the municipality provided that notice of the cancellation is included in the Agency’s annual proposed Transportation Program.

For the purpose of enabling the State, without delay, to take advantage of economic development proposals that increase jobs for Vermonters, a transportation project certified by the Governor as essential to the economic infrastructure of the State economy, or a local economy, may be approved for construction by a committee comprising the Joint Fiscal Committee meeting with the Chairs of the Transportation Committees or their designees without explicit project authorization through an enacted Transportation Program, in the event that such authorization is otherwise required by law.

The Agency of Transportation, in coordination with the Agency of Natural Resources and the Division for Historic Preservation, shall prepare and implement a plan for advancing approved projects contained in the approved Transportation Program. The plan shall include the assignment of a project manager from the Agency of Transportation for each project. The Agency of Transportation, the Agency of Natural Resources, and the Division for Historic Preservation shall set forth provisions for expediting the permitting process and establishing a means for evaluating each project during concept design planning if more than one agency is involved to determine whether it should be advanced or deleted from the Program.

For purposes of subsection (h) of this section, “emergency or safety issues” shall mean:

serious damage to a transportation facility caused by a natural disaster over a wide area, such as a flood, hurricane, earthquake, severe storm, or landslide; or

catastrophic or imminent catastrophic failure of a transportation facility from any cause; or

any condition identified by the Secretary as hazardous to the traveling public; or

any condition evidenced by fatalities or a high incidence of crashes.

The Agency shall develop a numerical grading system to assign a priority rating to all Program Development Paving, Program Development Roadway, Program Development Safety and Traffic Operations, Program Development State and Interstate Bridge, Town Highway Bridge, and Bridge Maintenance projects. The rating system shall consist of two separate, additive components as follows:

One component shall be limited to asset management- and performance-based factors that are objective and quantifiable and shall consider, without limitation, the following:

the existing safety conditions in the project area and the impact of the project on improving safety conditions;

the average, seasonal, peak, and nonpeak volume of traffic in the project area, including the proportion of traffic volume relative to total volume in the region, and the impact of the project on congestion and mobility conditions in the region;

the availability, accessibility, and usability of alternative routes;

the impact of the project on future maintenance and reconstruction costs;

the relative priority assigned to the project by the relevant regional planning commission; and

the resilience of the transportation infrastructure to floods and other extreme weather events.

The second component of the priority rating system shall consider, without limitation, the following factors:

the importance of the transportation infrastructure as a factor in the local, regional, or State economy; and

the importance of the transportation infrastructure in the health, social, and cultural life of the surrounding communities.

The priority rating system for Program Development Roadway projects shall award as bonus points an amount equal to 10 percent of the total base possible rating points to projects within a designated downtown development district established pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 2793

.

The annual Transportation Program shall include an individual priority rating pursuant to subsection (l) of this section for each highway paving, roadway, safety and traffic operations, and bridge project in the program along with a description of the system and methodology used to assign the ratings.

The Agency’s annual Transportation Program shall include a project-by-project description in each program of all proposed spending of funds for the development and evaluation of projects. In the approved annual Transportation Program, these funds shall be reserved to the identified projects subject to the discretion of the Secretary to reallocate funds to other projects within the program when it is determined that the scheduled expenditure of the identified funds will be delayed due to permitting, local decision making, the availability of federal or State funds, or other unanticipated problems.

For projects initially approved by the General Assembly for inclusion in the State Transportation Program after January 1, 2006, the Agency’s proposed Transportation Program prepared pursuant to subsection (a) of this section and the official Transportation Program prepared pursuant to subsection (f) of this section shall include the year in which such projects were first approved by the General Assembly.

The Agency shall include the annual maintenance required for the Lamoille Valley Rail Trail (LVRT), running from Swanton to St. Johnsbury, in the Transportation Program it presents to the General Assembly under subsection (a) of this section. The proposed authorization for the maintenance of the LVRT shall be sufficient to cover:

maintenance and repair or replacement of any bridges along the LVRT;

maintenance and repair of the fencing along the LVRT and any leased lines;

maintenance and repair of the stormwater systems for the LVRT;

any large-scale surface maintenance required due to dangerous conditions along the LVRT or compromise of the rail bed of the LVRT, or both;

resolution of any unauthorized encroachments related to the rail bed, but not the recreational use of the LVRT; and

any other maintenance obligations required of the Agency under a memorandum of understanding entered into regarding the maintenance of the LVRT.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 6, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

1991, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 25b, eff. May 15, 1992;

1993, No. 89

, § 22;

1993, No. 89

, § 22;

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

1995, No. 60

, § 20, eff. April 25, 1995;

1995, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 22, 1996;

1997, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 12a, eff. April 27, 1998;

2001, No. 64

, § 9, eff. June 16, 2001;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. June 9, 2004;

2005, No. 80

, §§ 53, 60;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 46, 47;

2007, No. 75

, §§ 35(a), 38;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 61, 62;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 22;

2011, No. 62

, § 36, eff. Jan. 1, 2012;

2011, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2015, No. 11

, § 25;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 18, 20, 21;

2017, No. 38

, § 13;

2019, No. 59

, § 9;

2021, No. 55

, § 13.

§ 10h.
Cooperative interstate agreement.

[Repealed.]

In connection with any authorized construction project in the State of Vermont that extends into or affects an adjoining state, the Agency, on behalf of the State of Vermont, may enter into a cooperative agreement with the adjoining state or any political subdivision of an adjoining state that apportions duties and responsibilities for planning preliminary engineering, including environmental studies, right-of-way acquisition, construction, and maintenance.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 121

, § 7, eff. June 22, 1989; amended

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 40;

2001, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. June 21, 2002;

2009, No. 33

, § 40;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 10i.
Transportation planning process.

Long-range systems plan. The Agency shall establish and implement a planning process through the adoption of a long-range multi-modal systems plan integrating all modes of transportation. The long-range multi-modal systems plan shall be based upon Agency transportation policy developed under section 10b of this title, other policies approved by the General Assembly, Agency goals, mission, and objectives, and demographic and travel forecasts, design standards, performance criteria, and funding availability. The long-range systems plan shall be developed with participation of the public and local and regional governmental entities and pursuant to the planning goals and processes set forth in 1988 Acts and Resolves No. 200. The plan shall be consistent with the Comprehensive Energy Plan (CEP) issued under

30 V.S.A. § 202b

.

Corridor studies. The Agency shall develop transportation corridor studies as needed, consistent with asset management policies implemented by the Agency, that identify environmental issues, community concerns, and travel projections. For each corridor, problems shall be identified and ranked according to their criticality and severity.

Transportation Program. The Transportation Program shall be developed in a fiscally responsible manner to accomplish the following objectives:

managing, maintaining, and improving the State’s existing transportation infrastructure to provide capacity, safety, and flexibility in the most cost-effective and efficient manner;

developing an integrated transportation system that provides Vermonters with transportation choices;

strengthening the economy, protecting the quality of the natural environment, and improving Vermonters’ quality of life; and

achieving the recommendations of the CEP.

Project identification and scope. The Agency shall identify and develop specific projects consistent with the objectives set forth in subsection (c) of this section. For each project, a project scope shall be prepared to identify the problem to be resolved by the project, the preferred alternative, project limits, and its conceptual design and estimated costs.

Information manual. An information manual giving a clear description of the planning process shall be prepared for town officials and the public.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 36; amended

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 31, eff. June 9, 2004;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 10j.
Intermodal and multimodal transportation facilities; project planning criteria.

Initial screening/threshold requirements. In considering a proposal for an intermodal or multimodal transportation facility, the Agency shall take into account the size of the community, the location of the proposed facility, and the presence of a logical combination of transportation modes. An intermodal facility requires the presence of several modes of transportation and a reasonable need to connect the different modes in a manner not easily done without the presence of a dedicated intermodal facility.

Project information. The Agency shall adopt a policy identifying the basic information to be provided in any application for a proposed intermodal or multimodal facility.

Project evaluation. Applications will be evaluated based on:

usage potential (i.e., how many people will be boarding and alighting at this location);

need for transfer facilities (i.e., how many will be transferring between vehicles or modes, and need to wait for connections);

modal connections (i.e., do modes actually connect at this location, what are the frequencies, and how many people will be making the connection);

opportunities for savings resulting from combining facilities (e.g., if railroad and bus stations are in the same building, does that save capital or operating dollars);

relationship of proposed costs to usage/revenue (annualized capital and operating costs per boarding);

relationship to 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 (1970 Acts and Resolves No. 250, as amended), 22 V.S.A. chapter 14 (historic preservation), 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A (historic downtown development) and the planning goals of

24 V.S.A. § 4302

;

whether the proposed project addresses needs identified in policy or service plans for other modes (i.e., intercity bus, passenger rail, aviation);

long-term viability from an operations and maintenance perspective; and

self-sustainability of project funding (i.e., what, if any, level of ongoing subsidy will be needed).

Project managers. A project manager shall be assigned to each intermodal and multimodal transportation facility project that has received State or federal funding and this assignment shall not delay the construction schedule.

State funding. It shall be the policy of the State that State funds not be expended on intermodal or multimodal projects that have federal funds specifically designated for them until they enter the construction phase.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. May 29, 2000.

§ 10k.
Statement of policy; asset management; sale of State property.

The Agency shall develop an asset management plan that is a systematic goal- and performance-driven management and decision-making process of operating, maintaining, and upgrading transportation assets cost-effectively. At a minimum, the asset management system shall:

identify transportation system indicators by which the different components of the transportation system may be evaluated;

list all of the infrastructure assets and their condition, including pavements, structures, and facilities;

include deterioration rates for infrastructure assets; and

determine, long-term, the annual funds necessary to fund infrastructure maintenance at the recommended performance level.

The Agency shall not negotiate nor offer for sale any State property for less than fair market value without the prior approval of the General Assembly, if in session, and, if not in session, the Joint Fiscal Committee. The Agency may sell or lease land to municipalities for less than fair market value when and for so long as the land is to be used by the municipality for transportation purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 64

, § 24, eff. June 16, 2001; amended

2003, No. 56

, § 66, eff. June 4, 2003;

2003, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 32, eff. June 9, 2004;

2021, No. 20

, § 80.

§ 10l.
Agency cooperation with regional planning commissions.

Legislative intent. The General Assembly finds that regional planning commissions possess a unique expertise that enables the Agency to conduct rural transportation planning and local consultation activities that build upon the integration of land use, environmental, and economic development inputs. To ensure the Agency continues to meet its local consultation requirements found in 23 C.F.R. § 250.212, the General Assembly requires the following duties of regional planning commissions as part of an annual contract and work preparing the transportation planning initiative (TPI).

Duties of regional planning commissions. Regional planning commissions, serving areas of the State not qualifying as a Metropolitan Planning Area under federal regulations, shall implement the transportation planning initiative (TPI) program. This program provides the mechanism by which the Agency coordinates policy development and planning to ensure the involvement by Vermont citizens and rural local officials. It shall include:

Ensuring that local officials and citizens are involved in the statewide transportation planning process.

Providing technical assistance to facilitate local officials and staff in making transportation policy and investment decisions.

Coordinating town planning and development regulations to meet better State transportation policies and investment priorities.

Participating in State and national transportation policy and planning development processes to ensure regional and local input.

Implementing a project evaluation process to prioritize all transportation projects within the regions utilizing State or federal funds to be included in the State Transportation Program.

Developing and maintaining a regional, multi-modal transportation plan that clearly details regional and local project, planning, and policy priorities.

Maintaining a regional transportation advisory committee (TAC) that reviews and provides input on all major State and federal transportation planning and policy decisions. In order to facilitate this input, the regional planning commissions, in collaboration with the Agency of Transportation, shall provide warning and notice of all public meetings regarding transportation plans, projects, and proposals.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 75

, § 31.